Indiana, session 2026, HB1144.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 36-7-42.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 42.5. Tourism Improvement Districts
Sec. 1. This chapter applies to all units except townships.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "activities" means any programs
or services that promote business activity or tourism activity and
are provided to confer specific benefits upon the businesses that
are located in the tourism improvement district.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "district" means a tourism
improvement district established by an ordinance adopted under
section 13 of this chapter.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "district management
association" means a private nonprofit entity designated in the
district plan that enters into a contract with a unit to administer
and implement the district's activities and improvements.
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "district plan" means a proposal
HB 1144—LS 6588/DI 129


for a district that contains the information described in section 9(c)
of this chapter.
Sec. 6. As used in this chapter, "improvements" means the
acquisition, construction, installation, or maintenance of any
tangible property in the district with an estimated useful life of five
(5) years or more.
Sec. 7. As used in this chapter, "legislative body" has the
meaning set forth in IC 36-1-2-9.
Sec. 8. As used in this chapter, "owner" refers to any person
recognized by the unit as the owner of a business within the
district, without regard to whether the person is the owner of the
real property on which the business is located.
Sec. 9. (a) A person that intends to file a petition for the
establishment of a district under this section must first provide
written notice to the clerk (as defined in IC 36-1-2-4) in the case of
a municipality, or the county auditor in the case of a county, of the
person's intent before initiating the petition process.
(b) A petition for the establishment of a district may be filed
with the clerk of the municipality or the county auditor not later
than one hundred twenty (120) days after the date on which the
notice of intent for the petition is filed with the clerk of the
municipality or the county auditor under subsection (a). The
petition shall include the name and legal status of the filing party
and the district plan.
(c) The district plan shall include at least the following:
(1) The name of the proposed district.
(2) Subject to section 9.5 of this chapter, a map of the
proposed district, including a description of the boundaries of
the district in a manner sufficient to identify the businesses
included.
(3) The proposed source or sources of financing, including:
(A) the proposed method and basis of levying the special
assessment in sufficient detail to allow each owner to
calculate the amount of the special assessment that may be
levied against the owner's business; and
(B) whether the district may issue bonds to finance
improvements.
(4) A list of the businesses to be assessed and a statement of
the manner in which the expenses of a district using a method
allowed under section 11 of this chapter will be imposed upon
a benefited business in proportion to the benefit received by
the business, including costs for operation and maintenance.
HB 1144—LS 6588/DI 129


(5) For purposes of imposing the special assessment and
determining the benefits of the district's activities and
improvements, a classification of the types of businesses
within the proposed district. The classification may include
the following variations in the assessment formula:
(A) Square footage of the business.
(B) Number of employees.
(C) Geography.
(D) Gross sales.
(E) Other similar factors that reasonably relate to the
benefit received.
(6) An estimate of the amount of revenue needed to
accomplish or pay for the district's proposed activities and
improvements.
(7) Subject to section 9.5 of this chapter, a statement
identifying the district management association, including the
district management association's board of directors and
governance structure and any proposed rules or regulations
that may be applicable to the district.
(8) A statement indicating where a complete copy of the
district plan, whether in hard copy or electronic form, may be
obtained or accessed.
(9) Any other item or matter required to be incorporated in
the district plan by the unit's legislative body. The legislative
body may require in the district plan that the boundaries of
the district be drawn to:
(A) exclude businesses; or
(B) prevent overlap of the district with another district or
area in which a special assessment is imposed.
Sec. 9.5. Owners of the following property may not be included
within the territory of a district and the owners of such property
shall not be considered in determining whether the petition
signature requirements under section 13 of this chapter are met:
(1) Any property that receives a homestead standard
deduction under IC 6-1.1-12-37.
(2) Any property that is used for single family residential
housing.
(3) Any property that is used for multi-unit residential
housing.
In addition, the property described in this section shall not be
subject to a special assessment under this chapter.
Sec. 10. Subject to section 9.5 of this chapter, the territory of a
HB 1144—LS 6588/DI 129


tourism improvement district:
(1) in the case of a municipality, may include only territory
within the municipality; or
(2) in the case of a county, may include only territory of the
county that is not within any municipality in the county.
Sec. 11. (a) A special assessment on businesses located within the
district shall be levied on the basis of the estimated benefit to the
businesses within the district. The unit's legislative body may use
the classification of the types of businesses described in section
9(c)(5) of this chapter in determining the benefit to a business
provided by the district.
(b) The special assessment that may be levied on businesses
located within the district may take any form that confers benefits
to the assessed business and may include any combination of the
following methods:
(1) A percentage rate per transaction at a business within the
district.
(2) A fixed rate per transaction per day at a business within
the district.
(3) A percentage of gross sales at a business within the
district.
(c) The special assessment may be levied on different types of
businesses located within the district and is not required to be
levied on the same basis or at the same rate.
Sec. 12. (a) After receipt of a petition under section 9 of this
chapter, the clerk of the municipality or the county auditor shall,
in the manner provided by IC 5-3-1, publish notice of a hearing on
the proposed district. The clerk of the municipality or the county
auditor shall mail a copy of the notice to each owner within the
proposed district. The notice must include the boundaries of the
proposed district, a description of the proposed activities and
improvements, the proposed formula for determining the
percentage of the total benefit to be received by each business, the
method of determining the benefit received by each business, and
the hearing date. The date of the hearing may not be more than
sixty (60) days after the date on which the notice is mailed.
(b) At the public hearing under subsection (a), the legislative
body shall hear all owners in the proposed district (who appear
and request to be heard) upon the questions of:
(1) the sufficiency of the notice;
(2) whether the proposed activities and improvements are of
public utility and benefit;
HB 1144—LS 6588/DI 129


(3) whether the formula or method to be used for the
assessment of special benefits is appropriate;
(4) whether the district contains all, or more or less than all,
of the territory specially benefited by the activities and
improvements; and
(5) whether each individual business owner:
(A) that did not sign to approve the petition; and
(B) would be subject to the assessment of the district that
has otherwise reached the approval threshold;
wishes to make a request for exclusion from the district, to be
approved or denied by the legislative body before the final
passage of the ordinance establishing the district.
Sec. 13. (a) After conducting a hearing on the proposed district,
the legislative body may adopt an ordinance establishing the
district if it determines that:
(1) the petition meets the requirements of this section and
sections 9 through 11 of this chapter;
(2) the activities and improvements to be undertaken in the
district will provide special benefits to businesses in the
district and will be of public utility and benefit;
(3) the benefits provided by the activities and improvements
will be new benefits that do not replace benefits existing
before the establishment of the district; and
(4) the formula or method to be used for the assessment of
special benefits is appropriate.
(b) The legislative body may adopt the ordinance only if it
determines that the petition has been signed by:
(1) at least fifty percent (50%) of the owners of businesses
within the proposed district; and
(2) the owners of businesses within the proposed district that
constitute more than fifty percent (50%) of the revenue to be
collected from the special assessments.
(c) The ordinance shall:
(1) incorporate the information set forth in the district plan;
(2) specify the time and manner in which special assessments
levied under this chapter are to be collected and paid to the
unit's fiscal officer for deposit in the tourism improvement
fund established under section 14 of this chapter; and
(3) include any other content that the legislative body
determines is reasonable as it relates to the operation of the
district.
For purposes of subdivision (2), the collection of special
HB 1144—LS 6588/DI 129


assessments under this chapter may occur at the same time and in
the same manner as for an innkeeper's tax under IC 6-9, including
the application of any enforcement mechanisms and interest and
penalty attributable to innkeeper's taxes under IC 6-9-29.
(d) The adoption of an ordinance establishing a district does not
affect and may not be construed to authorize any decrease in the
level of publicly funded tourism promotion services that existed
before the district's establishment.
Sec. 14. (a) The unit's fiscal officer shall establish a special fund,
known as the tourism improvement fund, and shall deposit in the
tourism improvement fund all special assessments received under
this chapter and any other amounts received by the fiscal officer.
(b) The unit's fiscal officer may transfer money in the tourism
improvement fund to the district management association to be
used only for the purposes specified in the ordinance establishing
the district. Any bonds issued under this chapter are payable solely
from special assessments deposited in the tourism improvement
fund and other revenues of the district.
(c) Any money earned from investment of money in the tourism
improvement fund becomes a part of the tourism improvement
fund.
Sec. 15. (a) The unit shall contract with the district management
association designated in the district plan to administer and
implement the district's activities and improvements.
(b) The district management association may be either an
existing nonprofit corporation or a newly formed nonprofit
corporation. If the district management association is a new
nonprofit corporation created to manage the district, the certificate
of incorporation or bylaws of the district management association
shall provide for voting representation of owners within the
district. If the district management association is an existing
nonprofit corporation, the existing nonprofit corporation may
create a committee of district owners or owners' representatives.
(c) The district management association may make
recommendations to the unit's legislative body with respect to any
matter involving or relating to the district.
(d) The unit's legislative body, for any consideration that it
considers appropriate, may license or grant to the district
management association the right to undertake or permit
commercial activities or other private uses of the streets or other
parts of the district in which the unit has any real property
interest.
HB 1144—LS 6588/DI 129


Sec. 16. (a) A district may issue bonds to provide improvements.
The term of any bonds issued may not exceed ten (10) years. If a
district is renewed under section 17 of this chapter, the term of any
bonds issued may not exceed ten (10) years from the date of
renewal.
(b) Bonds issued under this chapter do not constitute an
indebtedness of the unit within the meaning of a constitutional or
statutory debt limitation.
Sec. 17. (a) The initial term for a district shall be at least three
(3) years and not more than ten (10) years.
(b) A district may be renewed for one (1) additional period of
not more than ten (10) years by following the procedures for the
initial establishment of a district as set forth in sections 9 through
13 of this chapter.
(c) If a district is renewed, any remaining revenues derived from
the levy of a special assessment, or any revenues derived from the
sale of assets acquired with the revenues, shall be transferred to the
renewed district. The following apply to the transfer of any
remaining revenues of a renewed district:
(1) If the renewed district includes a business not included in
the prior district, the remaining revenues shall be spent to
benefit only the business in the prior district.
(2) If the renewed district does not include a business included
in the prior district, the remaining revenues attributable to
the parcel shall be refunded to the owners of the business by
applying the method the district used under section 11 of this
chapter to calculate the special assessment before the renewal.
(d) The boundaries, special assessments, improvements, or
activities of a renewed district are not required to be the same as
the original or prior district.
Sec. 18. An ordinance adopted under section 13 of this chapter
may be amended if notice of the proposed amendment is published
and mailed in the manner provided by section 12 of this chapter.
However, if an amendment proposes to:
(1) levy a new or increased special assessment;
(2) change the district's boundaries; or
(3) issue a new bond;
the unit's legislative body shall require compliance with the
procedures set forth in sections 9 through 13 of this chapter before
amending the ordinance.
Sec. 19. (a) During the operation of the district, there shall be a
thirty (30) day period, beginning one (1) year after the date of the
HB 1144—LS 6588/DI 129


district's establishment and in each year thereafter, in which the
owners may request dissolution of the district in accordance with
this section.
(b) After a public hearing before the unit's legislative body, the
legislative body may dissolve a district by ordinance in either of the
following circumstances:
(1) If the legislative body finds there has been
misappropriation of funds, malfeasance, or a violation of law
in connection with the management of the district.
(2) At any time during the annual thirty (30) day period
described in subsection (a).
(c) Upon the written petitions of the owners or authorized
representatives of businesses in the district that pay fifty percent
(50%) or more of the special assessments levied, the unit's
legislative body shall pass a resolution of intention to dissolve the
district.
(d) The unit's legislative body shall first adopt a resolution of
intention to dissolve the district before the public hearing to
dissolve a district under this section. The resolution of intention
must include each of the following items:
(1) The reason for the dissolution.
(2) The time and place of the public hearing.
(3) A proposal to dispose of any assets acquired with the
revenues of the special assessments levied within the district.
The notice of the hearing on the resolution of intent to dissolve the
district shall be published in the manner provided by IC 5-3-1 and
must also be given by mail to the owner of each business subject to
a special assessment in the district. The legislative body shall
conduct the public hearing on the resolution of intention to dissolve
the district not later than thirty (30) days after the date the notice
is mailed to the assessed owners.
(e) The public hearing to dissolve the district shall be held not
more than sixty (60) days after the date of the adoption of the
resolution of intention.
(f) A dissolution of a district under this section has the effect of
repealing the ordinance adopted under section 13 of this chapter
that established the district.
Sec. 20. (a) The district management association shall submit an
annual report to the legislative body and the fiscal body before
January 1 of each year, beginning in the year after the first year of
the district's establishment.
(b) The report shall contain the following information:
HB 1144—LS 6588/DI 129


(1) The use of revenue collected from special assessments
levied under this chapter for that year.
(2) The activities and improvements to be provided for the
ensuing year and an estimate of the cost of providing the
activities and improvements for the ensuing year.
(3) The estimated amount of any surplus or deficit revenues
to be carried over from the prior year.
Sec. 21. (a) Upon the dissolution or expiration without renewal
of a district, any remaining revenues, after all outstanding debts
are paid, derived from the:
(1) levy of special assessments; or
(2) sale of assets acquired with the revenues of the district or
from bond reserve funds or construction funds;
shall be refunded to the owners located within the district on or
before the date of the district's dissolution or expiration without
renewal.
(b) The amount of the refund provided under subsection (a) to
an owner shall be determined by applying the method the district
used under section 11 of this chapter to calculate the special
assessment in the year:
(1) in which the district was dissolved or allowed to expire
without renewal; or
(2) before the district was dissolved or allowed to expire
without renewal if a special assessment had not been levied.
However, in lieu of providing a refund, the unit's legislative body
may instead elect to spend any remaining revenues on activities
and improvements specified in the ordinance that established the
district before its dissolution or expiration without renewal.
(c) Any liabilities incurred by the district are not an obligation
of the unit and are payable solely from the collection of special
assessments deposited in the special fund under section 14 of this
chapter and other revenues of the district.
Sec. 22. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter,
special assessments levied to pay the principal and interest on any
bonds issued under this chapter may not be reduced or terminated
if doing so would interfere with the timely retirement of the debt.
HB 1144—LS 6588/DI 129


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. Speaker: Your Committee on Local Government, to which was
referred House Bill 1144, has had the same under consideration and
begs leave to report the same back to the House with the
recommendation that said bill be amended as follows:
Page 2, line 27, delete "A" and insert "Subject to section 9.5 of this
chapter, a".
Page 3, line 14, delete "A" and insert "Subject to section 9.5 of this
chapter, a".
Page 3, between lines 28 and 29, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"Sec. 9.5. Owners of the following property may not be included
within the territory of a district and the owners of such property
shall not be considered in determining whether the petition
signature requirements under section 13 of this chapter are met:
(1) Any property that receives a homestead standard
deduction under IC 6-1.1-12-37.
(2) Any property that is used for single family residential
housing.
(3) Any property that is used for multi-unit residential
housing.
In addition, the property described in this section shall not be
subject to a special assessment under this chapter.".
Page 3, line 29, delete "The" and insert "Subject to section 9.5 of
this chapter, the".
Page 4, line 30, delete "and".
Page 4, line 33, delete "improvements." and insert "improvements;
and
(5) whether each individual business owner:
(A) that did not sign to approve the petition; and
(B) would be subject to the assessment of the district that
has otherwise reached the approval threshold;
wishes to make a request for exclusion from the district, to be
approved or denied by the legislative body before the final
passage of the ordinance establishing the district.".
Page 5, line 8, delete "or" and insert "and".
and when so amended that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to HB 1144 as introduced.)
MAY
Committee Vote: yeas 11, nays 0.
HB 1144—LS 6588/DI 129